Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 9. Professional Limited Liability Companies.

§79-29-901.
Applicability of remaining articles of chapter.

The other provisions of this chapter apply to professional limited liability companies, both domestic and foreign, to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-901 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 55; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the applicability of the remaining articles of the chapter.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-902.
Article definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Disqualified person” means an individual, general partnership, professional limited liability company, professional limited liability partnership or other entity that for any reason is or becomes ineligible under this article to be a member of a professional limited liability company.

“Domestic professional limited liability company” means a professional limited liability company.

“Foreign professional limited liability company” means a limited liability company formed for the purpose of rendering professional services under a law other than the law of this state.

“Law” includes rules promulgated in accordance with Section 79-29-929.

“Licensing authority” means the office, board, agency, court or other authority in this state empowered to license or otherwise authorize the rendition of a professional service.

“Professional limited liability company” means a limited liability company, other than a foreign professional limited liability company, subject to the provisions of this article.

“Professional service” means a service that may be lawfully rendered only by a person licensed or otherwise authorized by a licensing authority in this state to render the service, including, without limitation, certified public accountants, dentists, architects, veterinarians, osteopaths, physicians, surgeons and attorneys at law.

“Qualified person” means an individual, general partnership, professional limited liability company, professional limited liability partnership or other entity that is eligible under this article to be a member of a professional limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-902 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 56; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to article definitions.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-903.
Election of professional limited liability company status.

One or more persons may form a professional limited liability company by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of formation which includes a statement that:(a) it is a professional limited liability company; and (b) its purpose is to render the specified professional services.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require a person rendering professional services in this state to render such services through a professional limited liability company or foreign professional limited liability company unless a law of this state other than this article so requires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected a typographical error in a statutory reference in (2). The reference to “Section 79-29-932” was changed to “Section 79-29-933.” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 5, 2008, meeting.

A former § 79-29-903 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 57; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the election of professional limited liability company status.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Filing fees, see § 79-29-1203.

§79-29-904.
Purposes.

Except to the extent authorized by subsection (2), a limited liability company may elect professional limited liability company status under Section 79-29-903, solely for the purpose of rendering professional services, including services ancillary to them, and solely within a single profession.

A limited liability company may elect professional limited liability company status under Section 79-29-903 for the purpose of rendering professional services within two (2) or more professions, and for the purpose of engaging in any lawful business authorized by Section 79-29-117(1) to the extent the combination of professional purposes or of professional and business purposes is not prohibited by the licensing law of this state applicable to each profession in the combination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-904 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 58; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the purposes of electing professional limited liability company status.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Licensing authority’s regulatory jurisdiction over individuals rendering professional service not restricted by this article, see § 79-29-931.

§79-29-905.
General powers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a professional limited liability company has the powers enumerated in Section 79-29-117(2).

A professional limited liability company may be a promoter, general partner, member, associate or manager of a partnership, joint venture, trust or other entity only if the entity is engaged solely in rendering professional services or in carrying on business authorized by the professional limited liability company’s certificate of formation and not prohibited by the licensing laws applicable to each profession rendering services through the professional limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-905 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 59; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the general powers of a professional limited liability company.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-906.
Rendering professional services.

A domestic or foreign limited liability company may render professional services in this state only through individuals licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to render the services.

Subsection (1) of this section does not:

Require an individual employed by a professional limited liability company to be licensed to perform services for the limited liability company if a license is not otherwise required;

Prohibit a licensed individual from rendering professional services in the individual’s capacity although the individual is a member, manager, employee or agent of a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company;

Prohibit an individual licensed in another state from rendering professional services for a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company in this state if not prohibited by the licensing authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-906 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 60; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the rendering of professional services by domestic or foreign limited liability company.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-907.
Prohibited activities.

A professional limited liability company may not render any professional service other than the professional service authorized by its certificate of formation.

Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit a professional limited liability company from investing its funds in real estate, mortgages, securities, or any other type of investment or from owning real or personal property appropriate for carrying on its business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-907 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 61; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to prohibited activities.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-908.
Corporate name.

The name of a domestic professional limited liability company and of a foreign professional limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state, in addition to satisfying the requirements of Sections 79-29-109 and 79-29-1007:

Must contain the words “professional limited liability company” or the abbreviations “P.L.L.C.” or “PLLC”;

May not contain language stating or implying that it is formed for a purpose other than that authorized by Section 79-29-904 and its certificate of formation; and

Must conform with any rule promulgated by the licensing authority having jurisdiction over a professional service described in the limited liability company’s certificate of formation.

Sections 79-29-109 and 79-29-1007 do not prevent the use of a name otherwise prohibited by those sections if it is the personal name of a member or former member of the domestic or foreign professional limited liability company or the name of an individual who was associated with a predecessor of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-908 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 62; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the corporate name of a professional limited liability company.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-909.
Who may become members.

No professional limited liability company organized under the provisions of this article may have as a member any person other than:

Individuals who are authorized by law in this or another state to render a professional service described in the limited liability company’s certificate of formation;

A professional limited liability company, domestic or foreign, authorized by law in this state to render a professional service described in the limited liability company’s certificate of formation;

General partnerships in which all the partners are individuals or entities otherwise authorized by paragraph (a), (b) or (d) of this subsection (1) to be members of a professional limited liability company under this article;

A professional limited liability partnership, domestic or foreign, authorized by law in this state to render a professional service described in the limited liability partnership’s certificate of registration;

Any other individual or entity not included in paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this subsection (1) if expressly authorized by the licensing authority having jurisdiction over the professional services described in the certificate of formation of the professional limited liability company.

A licensing authority with jurisdiction over a profession may by rule restrict or condition, or revoke in part, the authority of a professional limited liability company subject to its jurisdiction to issue membership interests.A rule promulgated under this section does not, of itself, make a member of a professional limited liability company at the time the rule becomes effective a disqualified person.

The certificate of formation may provide for additional limitations and restrictions on members or for additional qualifications of members and such limitations, restrictions or qualifications shall be valid and enforceable in each instance.

Membership interests issued in violation of this section or a rule promulgated under this section are void.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-909 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 63; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to who may become a member.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-910.
Membership interest transfer restrictions.

A member of a professional limited liability company may transfer the member’s membership interests only to qualified persons.Unless otherwise prohibited by the certificate of formation or operating agreement, a member of a professional limited liability company may pledge the member’s membership interest to a qualified person or to a disqualified person.

A transfer of a membership interest made in violation of subsection (1), except one made by operation of law or court judgment, is void.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-910 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 64; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to membership interest transfer restrictions.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-911.
Compulsory acquisition of membership interests after death or disqualification of a member.

A professional limited liability company must acquire, or cause to be acquired by a qualified person, a member’s membership interest if:

The member dies and the successor in interest to the deceased member is not a qualified person, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section;

The member becomes a disqualified person, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section; or

The membership interest is transferred by operation of law or court judgment to a disqualified person, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

If a price for the membership interest is established in accordance with the certificate of formation or written operating agreement or by private agreement, that price controls.If the price is not so established, the limited liability company shall acquire the membership interest in accordance with Section 79-29-912.If the disqualified person rejects the limited liability company’s purchase offer made pursuant to Section 79-29-912, either the person or the limited liability company may commence a proceeding under Section 79-29-913 to determine the price of the membership interest.

This section does not require the acquisition of membership interests in the event of disqualification if the disqualification lasts no more than five (5) months from the date the disqualification or transfer occurs.A member who becomes a disqualified person shall notify the limited liability company promptly.

This section and Section 79-29-912 do not prevent or relieve a professional limited liability company from paying pension benefits or other deferred compensation for services rendered to a former member if otherwise permitted by law.

A provision for the acquisition of membership interests contained in a professional limited liability company’s certificate of formation or operating agreement, or in a private agreement, is specifically enforceable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-911 [ Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 65;
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to compulsory acquisition of membership interests after death or disqualification of a member.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Chancery court did not err in granting a law firm summary judgment in its action alleging that it had satisfied its contractual obligations to an expelled member because in compliance with Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-911, the firm’s operating agreement specifically provided a formula to determine an expelled member’s interest; by opting against dissolution and instead tendering the member a check, the firm acted as authorized by its agreement. Martindale v. Hortman Harlow Bassi Robinson & McDaniel PLLC, 119 So.3d 338, 2012 Miss. App. LEXIS 603 (Miss. Ct. App. 2012), cert. denied, 119 So.3d 328, 2013 Miss. LEXIS 398 (Miss. 2013).

§79-29-912.
Acquisition procedure.

If membership interests must be acquired under Section 79-29-911, the professional limited liability company shall deliver a written notice to the executor or administrator of the estate of its deceased member, or to the disqualified person or transferee, offering to purchase the membership interest at a price the limited liability company believes represents the membership interests’ fair value as of the date of death, disqualification or transfer.The offer notice must be accompanied by the limited liability company’s balance sheet for the most recent fiscal year ending prior to the date of death or disqualification, an income statement for that fiscal year, a reconciliation of members’ capital accounts for that fiscal year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any.

The disqualified person has thirty (30) days from the effective date of the notice to accept the limited liability company’s offer or demand that the limited liability company commence a proceeding under Section 79-29-913 to determine the fair value of the disqualified person’s membership interest. If the individual accepts the offer, the limited liability company shall make payment for the membership interests within sixty (60) days from the effective date of the offer notice (unless a later date is agreed on) upon the disqualified person’s surrender of the disqualified person’s membership interest to the limited liability company.

After the limited liability company makes payment for the membership interest, the disqualified person has no further interest in the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-912 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 66; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to acquisition procedures.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Applicability of this section to professional limited liability company in existence on July 1, 1995, see § 79-29-933.

Substitution of the term “book value” for “fair value” in this section for professional limited liability companies in existence on July 1, 1995, see § 79-29-933.

§79-29-913.
Court action to appraise membership interests.

If the disqualified member does not accept the professional limited liability company’s offer under Section 79-29-912(2) within the thirty-day period, the member during the following thirty-day period may deliver a written notice to the professional limited liability company demanding that it commence a proceeding to determine the fair value of the membership interest. The professional limited liability company may commence a proceeding at any time during the sixty (60) days following the effective date of its offer notice. If it does not do so, the member may commence a proceeding against the professional limited liability company to determine the fair value of the disqualified person’s membership interest.

The professional limited liability company or disqualified member shall commence the proceeding in the chancery court of the county where the professional limited liability company’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the professional limited liability company does not have a principal office in this state. The professional limited liability company shall make the disqualified person a party to the proceeding as in an action against the disqualified person’s membership interest. The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced is plenary and exclusive.

The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the power described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it.

The disqualified member is entitled to judgment for the fair value of the disqualified person’s membership interest determined by the court as of the date of death, disqualification or transfer, together with interest from that date at a rate found by the court to be fair and equitable.

The court may order the judgment paid in installments determined by the court.

“Fair value” means the value of the membership interest of the professional limited liability company determined:

Using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

Without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 117, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in this section. In the section as effective January 1, 2013, in the second sentence in (1), “professional” was inserted preceding “limited liability company.” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 16, 2012, meeting.

A former § 79-29-913 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to court action to appraise membership interests.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

The 2012 amendment, in (1), inserted “professional” preceding “limited liability company” the second time it appears in the first sentence and in the last sentence; in (2), in the first sentence, inserted “professional” preceding “limited liability company”
the first two times it appears, and substituted “principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the professional limited liability company does not have a principal office in this state” for “principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located,” and inserted , inserted “professional” near the beginning of the second sentence.

Applicability of this section to professional limited liability company in existence on July 1, 1995, see § 79-29-933.

Substitution of the term “book value” for “fair value” in this section for professional limited liability companies in existence on July 1, 1995, see § 79-29-933.

§79-29-914.
Court costs and fees of experts.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under Section 79-29-913 shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court, and shall assess the costs against the professional limited liability company.But the court may assess costs against the disqualified member, in an amount the court finds equitable, if the court finds the member acted arbitrarily, vexatiously or not in good faith in refusing to accept the limited liability company’s offer.

The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the disqualified member against the limited liability company and in favor of the disqualified member if the court finds that the fair value of the disqualified member’s membership interest substantially exceeded the amount offered by the limited liability company or that the limited liability company did not make an offer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-914 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to court costs and fees of experts.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, a typographical error in (2) was corrected by inserting the word “the” preceding “disqualified member’s membership interest.”

Applicability of this section to professional limited liability company in existence on July 1, 1995, see § 79-29-933.

Substitution of the term “book value” for “fair value” in this section for professional limited liability companies in existence on July 1, 1995, see § 79-29-933.

§79-29-915.
Cancellation of disqualified membership interests.

If the membership interest of a disqualified person is not acquired under Section 79-29-912 or 79-29-913 within ten (10) months after the death of the member or within five (5) months after the disqualification or transfer, the professional limited liability company shall immediately cancel the membership interest on its books and the disqualified person has no further interest as a member in the limited liability company other than the disqualified member’s right to payment of the fair value of the membership interest under Section 79-29-912 or 79-29-913.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-915 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to cancellation of disqualified membership interests.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-917.
Voting of membership interests.

Only a qualified person may be appointed a proxy to vote the membership interest of a professional limited liability company.

A voting trust with respect to membership interests of a professional limited liability company is not valid unless all of its trustees and beneficiaries are qualified persons.If a beneficiary who is a qualified person dies or becomes disqualified, a voting trust valid under this subsection continues to be valid for ten (10) months after the date of death or for five (5) months after the disqualification occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-917 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to voting of membership interests.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-918.
Confidential relationship.

The relationship between an individual rendering professional services as an employee of a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company and the individual’s client or patient is the same as if the individual were rendering the services as a sole practitioner.

The relationship between a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company and the client or patient for whom its employee is rendering professional services is the same as that between the client or patient and the employee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-918 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the confidential nature of the relationship between employee of professional limited liability company rendering professional services and his client.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-919.
Privileged communications.

A privilege applicable to communications between an individual rendering professional services and the person receiving the services recognized under the statute or common law of this state is not affected by this article.The privilege applies to a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company and to its employees in all situations in which it applies to communications between an individual rendering professional services on behalf of the limited liability company and the person receiving the services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-919 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to privileged communications.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-920.
Responsibility for professional services.

Each individual who renders professional services as an employee of a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company is liable for a negligent or wrongful act or omission in which the member personally participates to the same extent as if the member rendered the services as a sole practitioner.A member or an employee of a domestic or foreign professional limited liability company is not liable, however, for the conduct of other members or employees of the limited liability company, except a person under the member’s direct supervision and control, while rendering professional services on behalf of the professional limited liability company to the person for whom such professional services were being rendered.

A domestic or foreign professional limited liability company whose employees perform professional services within the scope of their employment or of their apparent authority to act for the limited liability company is liable to the same extent as its employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-920 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the responsibility for professional services rendered by employee of professional limited liability company.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Pursuant to Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-920, the attorney could not be held liable unless he either personally participated in a negligent or wrongful act or directly supervised someone who committed wrongful conduct; the client’s allegations that the attorney was a member of the firm and that the firm used the terms “we,” “us,” and “the firm” in correspondence, even if accepted as true, did not meet either of these two requirements, and there was nothing in the record to suggest that the attorney had any contact whatsoever with the client. Keszenheimer v. Boyd, 897 So. 2d 190, 2004 Miss. App. LEXIS 874 (Miss. Ct. App. 2004), cert. denied, 896 So. 2d 373, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 196 (Miss. 2005).

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts – Issues Relating to Liability of Limited Liability Company for Acts of Its Members, Managers, Officers, and Agents. 46 A.L.R.6th 1.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts – Issues Relating to Liability of Limited Liability Company for Acts of Its Members, Managers, Officers, and Agents.
47 A.L.R.6th 1.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnerships §§ 831-883.

68 C.J.S., Partnerships §§ 583, 584 et seq.

§79-29-921.
Merger.

If all the members of the disappearing and surviving limited liability companies, unless prohibited by certificate of formation or the operating agreement, are qualified to be members of the surviving limited liability company, a professional limited liability company may merge with another domestic or foreign professional limited liability company or with a domestic or foreign limited liability company.

If the surviving limited liability company is to render professional services in this state, it must comply with this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-921 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to merger.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnerships § 811.

§79-29-922.
Termination of professional activities.

If a professional limited liability company ceases to render professional services, it must amend its certificate of formation to delete references to rendering professional services and to conform its name to the requirements of Section 79-29-109.After the amendment becomes effective the limited liability company may continue in existence as a limited liability company under this chapter other than the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-922 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to termination of professional activities.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Filing fees, see § 79-29-1203.

§79-29-923.
Judicial dissolution.

The Attorney General may commence a proceeding under Section 79-29-803 to dissolve a professional limited liability company if:

The Secretary of State or a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the limited liability company’s certificate of formation serves written notice on the limited liability company under Section 79-35-13 that it has violated or is violating a provision of this article;

The limited liability company does not correct each alleged violation, or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State or licensing authority that it did not occur, within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under Section 79-35-13; and

The Secretary of State or licensing authority certifies to the Attorney General a description of the violation, that it notified the limited liability company of the violation, and that the limited liability company did not correct it, or demonstrate that it did not occur, within sixty (60) days after perfection of service of the notice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 118, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

A former § 79-29-923 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to judicial dissolution.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-13” for “79-29-125” near the end of (a) and (b).

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnerships §§ 910-915.

68 C.J.S., Partnerships §§ 610-613.

§79-29-924.
Authority to transact business.

A foreign professional limited liability company may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

A foreign professional limited liability company may not obtain a certificate of authority unless:

Its name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-29-908;

It is formed for one or more of the purposes described in Section 79-29-904; and

All of its members would be qualified persons if the foreign professional limited liability company were a domestic professional limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-924 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to authority to transact business.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 9-15.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 165-187, 225-227, 264, 265.

§79-29-925.
Application for certificate of authority.

The application of a foreign professional limited liability company for a certificate of authority to render professional services in this state must contain the information called for by Section 79-29-1003 and in addition include a statement that all of its members meet the requirements of Section 79-29-924.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-925 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to application for certificate of authority to render professional services in Mississippi by foreign professional limited liability company.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Filing fees, see § 79-29-1203.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 204.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 968 et seq.

§79-29-926.
Revocation of certificate of authority.

The Secretary of State may administratively revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign professional limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state if a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the limited liability company’s certificate of formation certifies to the Secretary of State that the limited liability company has violated or is violating a provision of this article and describes the violation.Such administrative revocation may be challenged by the foreign professional limited liability company in the chancery court of the county where the foreign professional limited liability company maintains its principal place of business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-926 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to revocation of certificate of authority.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnerships §§ 784, 894.

§79-29-930.
Rulemaking by licensing authority.

Each licensing authority is empowered to promulgate rules expressly authorized by this article if the rules are consistent with the public interest or required by the public health or welfare or by generally recognized standards of professional conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-930 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to rulemaking by licensing authorities.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-931.
Licensing authority’s regulatory jurisdiction.

This article does not restrict the jurisdiction of a licensing authority over individuals rendering a professional service within the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, nor does it affect the interpretation or application of any law pertaining to standards of professional conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-931 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to licensing authority’s regulatory jurisdiction.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-933.
Application to existing professional limited liability companies.

This article does not apply to a limited liability company now existing or later formed under a law of this state that is not a professional limited liability company unless the limited liability company elects professional limited liability company status under Section 79-29-903.

This article does not affect an existing or future right or privilege to render professional services through the use of any other form of business entity.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by an amendment to the certificate of formation, for professional limited liability companies in existence on July 1, 1995, Sections 79-29-912, 79-29-913 and 79-29-914 shall be applied by substituting the term “book value“ for the term “fair value” in such sections only.Book value shall be determined from the books and records of the professional limited liability company in accordance with the regular method of accounting used by the professional limited liability company and shall be determined as of the end of the month immediately preceding the death or disqualification of the member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.